Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-435
Infraction; citation issued in lieu of arrest; exception.

Except as provided in section 29-427, for any offense classified as an infraction, a citation shall be issued in lieu of arrest or continued custody pursuant to sections 29-422 to 29-429.

Laws 1979, LB 534, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 19, § 5.

Except as provided in section 29‑427, for any offense classified as an infraction, a citation shall be issued in lieu of arrest or continued custody. State v. Petersen, 12 Neb. App. 445, 676 N.W.2d 65 (2004).